Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-602 Newborn children
coverage. (a) All individual and group hospital and medical service
corporation contracts which provide coverage for a family member of the
subscriber shall, as to such family member's coverage, also provide that the
benefits applicable for children shall be payable or provided with respect to a
newly born child of the subscriber from the moment of birth; provided that the
coverage for newly born children shall be limited to the necessary care and
treatment of medically diagnosed congenital defects and birth abnormalities.
If payment of a specific subscription fee or premium is required to provide
coverage for the child, the contract may require that notification of birth of
a newly born child and payment of the required fee or premium must be furnished
to the service corporation within thirty-one days after the date of birth in
order to have coverage continue beyond such thirty-one-day period. The
requirements of this section shall apply to all subscriber contracts delivered
or issued for delivery in this State more than one hundred twenty days after
July 1, 1988.

(b) No provision in subsection (a) shall be
construed to provide or include coverage for routine well-baby services. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Revision Note

"July 1, 1988" substituted for "the effective
date of this section".

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next